braille/translate/src/phone/tables/no-no-g2.ctb
begword tilfell 2345-124
word tilgang 2345-1245-1245
begword tilgang 2345-1245-1245
word undergikk 12345-1245-13

word undergang 12345-1245-1245			# level 2 contractions
begword undergang 12345-1245-1245			# level 2 contractions
word utenfor 136-1246
word utenfra 136-124
word vil 1236-123
word ville 1236-123-15
word villet 1236-123-346

word viss 1236-234
word uviss 136-1236-234
begword uviss 136-1236-234
begword viss 1236-234

word vanske 1236-14
begword vanske 1236-14

word vært 1236-2345

# ------------------------------------------------------
# Words with problems - should be converted this way:

word det 145-346
word dets 145-346-234
word den 145-126
word dens 145-126-234
word dent 145-126-2345
word dente 145-126-1256
word dert 145-156-2345
word dett 145-346-2345
word fores 124-135-12356-234
word mede 134-15-1456
word noens 1345-135-126-234
